Utah statutes.
72-11-210.    Passenger ropeways -- Additional powers and duties of committee.

The committee may:

(1)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules establishing:

(a)  public safety in the design, construction, and operation of passenger ropeways that:

(i)  adopt the American National Standard for Passenger Ropeways;

(ii)  modify the standard under Subsection (1)(a)(i); or

(iii)  establish an equivalent standard; and

(b)  the annual registration date;

(2)  hold hearings and take evidence in all matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties vested in the committee;

(3)  subpoena witnesses;

(4)  administer oaths;

(5)  compel the testimony of witnesses and the production of books, papers, and records relevant to any inquiry;

(6)  approve, deny, revoke, and renew the registrations provided for in this chapter;

(7)  cause the prosecution and enjoinder of all persons violating the provisions of this chapter and incur the necessary expenses;

(8)  elect officers and adopt a seal which may be affixed to all registrations issued by the committee; and

(9)  employ, within the funds available, and prescribe the duties of a secretary and other personnel as the  committee considers necessary.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

